Rhode Island statutes. Title 6 Commercial Law — General Regulatory Provisions
Chapter 13.1 Deceptive Trade Practices

6-13.1-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Documentary material” means the original or a copy of any book, record, report, memorandum, paper, communication, tabulation, map, chart, photograph, mechanical transcription, or other tangible document or recording wherever situated.

“Examination” of documentary material includes the inspection, study, or copying of any documentary material, and the taking of testimony under oath or acknowledgment in respect of any documentary material or copy of any documentary material.

“Person” means natural persons, corporations, trusts, partnerships, incorporated or unincorporated associations, and any other legal entity.

“Rebate” means the return of a payment or a partial payment that serves as a discount or reduction in price.

“Trade” and “commerce” mean the advertising, offering for sale, sale, or distribution of any services and any property, tangible or intangible, real, personal, or mixed, and any other article, commodity, or thing of value wherever situate, and include any trade or commerce directly or indirectly affecting the people of this state.

“Unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices” means any one or more of the following:

Passing off goods or services as those of another;

Causing likelihood of confusion or of misunderstanding as to the source, sponsorship, approval, or certification of goods or services;

Causing likelihood of confusion or of misunderstanding as to affiliation, connection, or association with, or certification by, another;

Using deceptive representations or designations of geographic origin in connection with goods or services;

Representing that goods or services have sponsorship, approval, characteristics, ingredients, uses, benefits, or quantities that they do not have or that a person has a sponsorship, approval, status, affiliation, or connection that he or she does not have;

Representing that goods are original or new if they are deteriorated, altered, reconditioned, reclaimed, used, or secondhand; and if household goods have been repaired or reconditioned, without conspicuously noting the defect that necessitated the repair on the tag that contains the cost to the consumer of the goods;

Representing that goods or services are of a particular standard, quality, or grade, or that goods are of a particular style or model, if they are of another;

Disparaging the goods, services, or business of another by false or misleading representation of fact;

Advertising goods or services with intent not to sell them as advertised;

Advertising goods or services with intent not to supply reasonably expectable public demand, unless the advertisement discloses a limitation of quantity;

Making false or misleading statements of fact concerning the reasons for, existence of, or amounts of price reductions;

Engaging in any other conduct that similarly creates a likelihood of confusion or of misunderstanding;

Engaging in any act or practice that is unfair or deceptive to the consumer;

Using any other methods, acts, or practices that mislead or deceive members of the public in a material respect;

Advertising any brand name goods for sale and then selling substituted brand names in their place;

Failure to include the brand name and or manufacturer of goods in any advertisement of the goods for sale, and, if the goods are used or secondhand, failure to include the information in the advertisement;

Advertising claims concerning safety, performance, and comparative price unless the advertiser, upon request by any person, the consumer council, or the attorney general, makes available documentation substantiating the validity of the claim;

Representing that work has been performed on or parts replaced in goods when the work was not in fact performed or the parts not in fact replaced; or

Failing to separately state the amount charged for labor and the amount charged for services when requested by the purchaser as provided for in § 44-18-12(b)(3).

Advertising for sale at a retail establishment the availability of a manufacturer’s rebate by displaying the net price of the advertised item (the price of the item after the rebate has been deducted from the item’s price) in the advertisement, unless the amount of the manufacturer’s rebate is provided to the consumer by the retailer at the time of the purchase of the advertised item. It shall be the retailer’s burden to redeem the rebate offered to the consumer by the manufacturer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 12, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 249, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 302, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 317, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 325, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 207, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 231, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 169, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 209, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 334, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 31, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 38, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 10.

6-13.1-2.
Unlawful acts or practices.

Unfair methods of competition and unfair or deceptive acts or practices in the conduct of any trade or commerce are declared unlawful.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 12, § 1.

6-13.1-3.
Interpretation.

It is the intent of the legislature that in construing §§

6-13.1-1

and

6-13.1-2

due consideration and great weight shall be given to the interpretations of the Federal Trade Commission and the federal courts relating to § 5(a) of the Federal Trade Commission Act. 15 U.S.C. § 45(a)(1), as from time to time amended.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 12, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 10.

6-13.1-4.
Exemptions.

Nothing in this chapter shall apply to actions or transactions permitted under laws administered by the department of business regulation or other regulatory body or officer acting under statutory authority of this state or the United States.

For actions brought by the attorney general, the exemption in subsection (a) applies only if the person claiming the exemption shows that:

The person’s business activities are subject to regulation by a state or federal agency; and

The activity or conduct is in compliance with orders, including insurance bulletins, or rules of, or a statute administered by, a federal or state government agency.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 12, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 206, § 1, effective July 7, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 329, § 1, effective July 9, 2021.

6-13.1-5.
Restraining prohibited acts.

Whenever the attorney general has reason to believe that any person is using, has used, or is about to use any method, act, or practice declared to be unlawful by §

6-13.1-2

, and that proceedings would be in the public interest, the attorney general may bring an action in the name of the state against the person to restrain by temporary or permanent injunction the use of the method, act, or practice, upon the giving of appropriate notice to that person and to seek any other relief that may be appropriate.

The action may be brought in the superior court of the county in which the person shall dwell or be found; or have his or her principal place of business; or with consent of the parties; or if the person is a nonresident or has no principal place of business within this state or if the superior court shall not be in session in the counties previously said to be applicable, may be brought in the superior court of Providence County. The superior courts are authorized to issue temporary or permanent injunctions to restrain and prevent violations of this chapter and the injunctions shall be issued without bond.

The court may make any additional orders or judgments that may be necessary to restore to any person in interest any moneys or property, real or personal, that may have been acquired by means of any practice in this chapter declared to be unlawful, including the appointment of a receiver in any case where the superior court finds that the assets of a corporation are in danger of being misapplied, dissipated, wasted, or lost, or the revocation of a license or certificate authorizing that person to engage in business in this state, or both.

Actions under this chapter may be brought without regard to the pendency of criminal proceedings arising out of the same acts or practices and no action shall bar the institution of criminal proceedings arising out of the same acts or practices. No involuntary admission by any person in the action shall be admissible in any subsequent criminal proceeding.

Any person who violates the terms of an injunction issued under this section shall forfeit and pay to the state a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation. For the purposes of this section, the superior court of a county issuing an injunction shall retain jurisdiction, and the cause shall be continued, and in those cases the attorney general, acting in the name of the state, may petition for recovery of civil penalties and damages.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 12, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 249, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 10; P.L. 2021, ch. 206, § 1, effective July 7, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 329, § 1, effective July 9, 2021.

6-13.1-5.1.
Power of receiver.

When a receiver is appointed by the court pursuant to this chapter, he or she shall have the power to sue for, collect, receive, and take into his or her possession all the goods and chattels, rights and credits, moneys and effects, lands and tenements, books, records, documents, papers, choses in action, bills, notes, and property of every description derived by means of any practice declared to be illegal and prohibited by this chapter, including property with which the property has been mingled if it cannot be identified in kind because of the commingling, and to sell, convey, and assign the property and hold and dispose of the proceeds under the direction of the court. Any person who has suffered damages as a result of the use of or employment of any unlawful practices and submits proof to the satisfaction of the court that he or she has in fact been damaged, may participate with general creditors in the distribution of the assets to the extent he or she has sustained out-of-pocket losses. In the case of a partnership or business entity, the receiver shall settle the estate and distribute the assets under the direction of the court. The court shall have jurisdiction of all questions arising in the proceedings and may make any orders and judgments therein as may be required.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 249, § 3.

6-13.1-5.2.
Private and class actions.

Any person who purchases or leases goods or services primarily for personal, family, or household purposes and thereby suffers any ascertainable loss of money or property, real or personal, as a result of the use or employment by another person of a method, act, or practice declared unlawful by §

6-13.1-2

, may bring an action under the rules of civil procedure in the superior court of the county in which the seller or lessor resides; is found; has his or her principal place of business or is doing business; or in the superior court of the county as is otherwise provided by law, to recover actual damages or five hundred dollars ($500), whichever is greater. The court may award damages equal to three (3) times the amount of actual damages and, in its discretion, provide other equitable relief that it deems necessary or proper.

Persons entitled to bring an action under subsection (a) of this section may, if the unlawful method, act, or practice has caused similar injury to numerous other persons similarly situated and if they adequately represent the similarly situated persons, bring an action on behalf of themselves and other similarly injured and situated persons to recover damages as provided for in subsection (a) of this section. In any action brought under this section, the court may in its discretion order, in addition to damages, injunctive or other equitable relief.

Upon commencement of any action brought under subsection (a) of this section, the clerk of court shall mail a copy of the complaint or other initial pleading to the attorney general and, upon entry of any judgment or decree in the action, shall mail a copy of the judgment or decree to the attorney general.

In any action brought by a person under this section, the court may award, in addition to the relief provided in this section, reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

Any permanent injunction, judgment, or order of the court made under §

6-13.1-5

shall be prima facie evidence in an action brought under this section that the respondent used or employed a method, act, or practice declared unlawful by §

6-13.1-2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 249, § 3; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 10; P.L. 2021, ch. 206, § 1, effective July 7, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 329, § 1, effective July 9, 2021.

6-13.1-6.
Assurances of voluntary compliance.

In the administration of this chapter, the attorney general may accept an assurance of voluntary compliance with respect to any method, act, or practice deemed to be a violation of the chapter from any person who has engaged or was about to engage in any method, act, or practice. Any assurance shall be in writing and filed with and subject to the approval of the superior court of the county in which the alleged violator shall dwell or have his or her principal place of business, or the superior court of Providence County. The assurance of voluntary compliance shall not be considered an admission of a violation for any purpose. Matters thus closed may be reopened at any time by the attorney general for further proceedings in the public interest pursuant to §

6-13.1-5

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 12, § 1.

6-13.1-7.
Investigations — Procedure — Remedies for failure to comply.

When it appears to the attorney general that a person has engaged in, is engaging in, or is about to engage in, any act or practice declared to be unlawful by this chapter, or when the attorney general believes it to be in the public interest that an investigation should be made to ascertain whether a person in fact has engaged in, is engaging in, or is about to engage in, any act or practice declared to be unlawful by this chapter, he or she may execute, in writing, and cause to be served upon any person who is believed to have information, documentary material, or physical evidence relevant to the alleged or suspected violation, an investigative demand stating the general subject matter of the investigation and the statute and section under which the suspected violation is alleged and require the person to furnish, under oath or otherwise, a report in writing stating the relevant facts and circumstances of which the person has knowledge, or to appear and testify or to produce relevant, documentary material or physical evidence for examination, at any reasonable time and place that may be stated in the investigative demand, concerning the advertisement, sale, or offering for sale of any goods or services or the conduct of any trade or commerce that is the subject matter of the investigation. All civil investigative demands may, at the discretion of the attorney general, be filed in the superior court of the county in which the person served with the demand shall dwell or have his principal place of business.

At any time before the return date specified in an investigative demand, or within twenty (20) days after the demand has been served, whichever period is shorter, a petition to extend the return date or to modify or set aside the demand, stating good cause, may be filed in the superior court in which the person served with the demand shall dwell or have his or her principal place of business, or in the superior court of Providence County.

To accomplish the objectives and to carry out the duties prescribed by this chapter, the attorney general, in addition to other powers conferred upon him or her by this chapter, may issue subpoenas to any person; administer an oath or affirmation to any person; conduct hearings in aid of any investigation or inquiry; and prescribe any forms and promulgate any rules and regulations that may be necessary, which rules and regulations shall have the force of law; provided that none of the powers conferred by this chapter shall be used for the purpose of compelling any natural person to furnish testimony or evidence that might tend to incriminate the person or subject him or her to a penalty or forfeiture; and provided further that information obtained pursuant to the powers conferred by this chapter shall not be made public or disclosed by the attorney general or his or her employees beyond the extent necessary for law enforcement purposes in the public interest.

Service of any notice, demand, or subpoena under this chapter shall be made personally within this state, but if personal service cannot be obtained, substituted service may be made in the following manner:

Personal service without this state;

The mailing of any notice, demand, or subpoena under this chapter by registered or certified mail to the last known place of business, residence, or abode within or without this state of the person for whom the service is intended;

As to any person other than a natural person, in the manner provided in the rules of civil procedure as if a complaint or other pleading that institutes a civil proceeding had been filed; or

Service that the superior court may direct in lieu of personal service within this state.

A person upon whom a demand is served pursuant to the provisions of this section shall comply with the terms of the demand unless otherwise provided by order of court. Subject to the protections provided for in subsection (c) relating to self incrimination, any person who, with intent to avoid, evade, or prevent compliance, in whole or in part, with any civil investigative demand under this section, removes from any place, conceals, withholds, or destroys, mutilates, alters, or by any other means falsifies any documentary material in the possession, custody, or control of any person subject of any demand, or knowingly conceals any relevant information, shall be fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

If any person fails or refuses to file any statement or report, or obey any subpoena or investigative demand issued by the attorney general, the attorney general may file in the superior court of the county in which the person shall dwell or be found; or has his or her principal place of business; or of Providence County, if the superior court at the previously mentioned county shall not be in session, or if the person is a nonresident or has no principal place of business in this state; or of the other county as may be agreed upon by the parties to the petition; and serve upon the person a petition for an order of the court for the enforcement of this section, and the petition may request, and the court shall have jurisdiction to grant, after notice and a hearing, an order:

Granting injunctive relief to restrain the person from engaging in the advertising or sale of any merchandise, or the conduct of any trade or commerce, that is involved in the alleged or suspected violation;

Vacating, annulling, or suspending the corporate charter of a corporation created by or under the laws of this state or revoking or suspending the certificate of authority to do business in this state of a foreign corporation or revoking or suspending any other licenses, permits, or certificates issued pursuant to law to the person that are used to further the allegedly unlawful practice; and

Granting any other relief that may be required, until the person files the statement or report, or obeys the subpoena or investigative demand.

Any final order so entered shall be subject to appeal to the state supreme court. Any disobedience of any final order entered under this section by any court shall be punished as a contempt of court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 12, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 249, § 4; P.L. 1987, ch. 131, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 10; P.L. 2016, ch. 535, § 1.

6-13.1-8.
Civil penalties.

Any person who violates the provisions of this chapter shall forfeit and pay to the state a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation. The attorney general, acting in the name of the state, may petition for recovery of civil penalties.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 12, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 206, § 1, effective July 7, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 329, § 1, effective July 9, 2021.

6-13.1-9.
Forfeiture of corporate franchise.

Upon petition by the attorney general, the superior court may, in its discretion, order the dissolution or suspension or forfeiture of franchise of any corporation that violates the terms of an injunction issued under §

6-13.1-5

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 12, § 1.

6-13.1-10.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter is declared unconstitutional, or the application of any provision of this chapter to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the constitutionality of the remainder of the chapter and its applicability to other persons and circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 12, § 1.

6-13.1-11.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and designated as the “Unfair Trade Practice and Consumer Protection Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 12, § 1.

6-13.1-12.
Appliances — Providing parts and manuals.

No person who manufactures or distributes parts for electric and/or gas appliances shall refuse to sell or provide the parts or to sell or provide a service manual to any person engaged in the business of servicing and repairing the appliances.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 182, § 1.

6-13.1-12.1.
Appliances — Information concerning used or rebuilt parts.

Any person engaged in the business of servicing or repairing electric and/or gas appliances for consumers shall, prior to any servicing or repair, inform the consumer of the intention to utilize any used or rebuilt parts. The utilization of used or rebuilt parts shall be indicated on the customer’s repair invoice. Any person who violates the provisions of this section shall pay a civil penalty of up to five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 370, § 1.

6-13.1-13.
Price discrimination prohibited.

No person who manufactures or distributes parts for electric and/or gas appliances shall discriminate in the price for which it offers the appliance parts for sale to any person engaged in the business of servicing or repairing the appliances.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 182, § 1.

6-13.1-14.
Penalties.

Any person who violates the provisions of §§

6-13.1-12

and/or

6-13.1-13

shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall pay a fine of five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 10.

6-13.1-15.
Piracy of recordings.

As used in this section, “article” means a phonograph record, disc, wire, tape, film, compact disc, audio or video cassette, compact video disc, or other device on which sounds or images are or can be recorded or otherwise stored.

Unless exempt under subsection (d), it is unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or association knowingly to:

Transfer or cause to be transferred any sounds recorded on any article on which sounds are recorded onto any other article;

Transfer or cause to be transferred any performance, whether live before an audience or transmitted by wire or through the air by radio or television, onto any article; or

Sell, distribute, circulate, offer for sale, distribution, or circulation, possess for the purpose of sale, distribution, or circulation, or cause to be sold, distributed, circulated, offered for sale, distribution, or circulation, or possessed for sale, distribution, or circulation, any article on which sounds or performances have been transferred without the consent of the person who owns the master article from which the sounds are derived or the right to record the performance.

It is unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or association to sell, distribute, circulate, offer for sale, distribution, or circulation or possess for the purposes of sale, distribution, or circulation, any article on which sounds or images have been transferred unless the article bears the actual name and address of the transferor of the sounds in a prominent place on its outside face or package.

This section does not apply to any person who transfers or causes to be transferred any sounds or images intended for, or in connection with, radio or television broadcast transmission or related uses for archival purposes or solely for the personal use of the person transferring or causing the transfer and without any compensation being derived by the person from the transfer.

Every person who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a felony and:

For the first offense is punishable by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) or by imprisonment in the state prison for not more than six (6) years, or by both fine and imprisonment.

For a subsequent offense is punishable by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) or by imprisonment in the state prison for not more than ten (10) years, or by both fine and imprisonment.

The court in its judgment of conviction may order the forfeiture and destruction or other disposition of all infringing articles and all implements, devices, and equipment used in the manufacture of the infringing articles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 257, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 387, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 10.

6-13.1-16.
Disclosure of service contract agreements.

It shall be a deceptive trade practice in violation of this chapter for any service contractor to fail to disclose to any person who is a prospective customer, at the time that the person makes initial contact by any means with the service contractor, that a service call made by the service contractor to the home or business of the prospective customer will require the payment by the prospective customer of separate and distinct fees for the following:

Service charge — the fee charged by the service contractor to respond to the request for service.

Labor charge.

As used in this section:

“Service contractor” means a person engaged in the business of repairing, overhauling, adjusting, assembling, or disassembling consumer goods.

“Person” means a natural person, corporation, trust, partnership, incorporated or unincorporated association, and any other legal entity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 134, § 1.

6-13.1-17.
Contracts — Provision to sell real estate.

It is unlawful for any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or association to provide in any contract for the purchase of consumer goods or documents related to them a provision allowing the seller the power to sell or attach real estate for default without first obtaining an order by a court exercising proper jurisdiction of the subject matter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 10.

6-13.1-18.
Manufacturers’ duties under motor vehicle warranties.

Failure by a motor vehicle manufacturer, as defined in §

31-5.2-1

, to comply with the provisions of chapter 5.2 of title 31 entitled “Consumer Enforcement of Motor Vehicle Warranties” shall constitute a deceptive trade practice under the terms of this chapter. All of the public and private remedies provided for in this chapter shall be available to enforce the provisions of chapter 5.2 of title 31.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 353, § 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 361, § 2.

6-13.1-19.
Motor vehicle dealer’s duty when selling used vehicle.

Failure of a motor vehicle dealer to comply with the provisions of chapter 5.3 of title 31 shall constitute a deceptive trade practice under the terms of this chapter. All of the public and private remedies provided for in this chapter shall be available to enforce the provisions of chapter 5.3 of title 31.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 478, § 2.

6-13.1-20.
Credit reports — Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Credit bureau” means any entity or person who or that, for monetary fees, dues, or on a cooperative nonprofit basis, regularly engages in whole or in part in the practice of assembling or evaluating consumer credit information or other information on consumers for the purpose of furnishing credit reports to third parties;

“Credit report” means any written, oral, or other communication of any information by a credit bureau bearing on a consumer’s credit worthiness, credit standing, or credit capacity, that is used or expected to be used or collected in whole or in part for the purpose of serving as a factor in establishing the consumer’s eligibility for:

Credit or insurance to be used primarily for personal, family, or household purposes;

Employment purposes; or

Other purposes authorized under the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1681 et seq.

“Credit report” does not include:

Any report containing information solely as to transactions or experiences between the consumer and the person making the report;

Any authorization or approval of a specific extension of credit directly or indirectly by the issuer of a credit card or similar device;

Any report in which a person who has been requested by a third party to make a specific extension of credit directly or indirectly to a consumer conveys his or her decision with respect to that request if the third party advises the consumer of the name and address of the person to whom the request was made and the person makes the disclosures to the consumer required under the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1681 et seq.; or

Any report containing information solely on a consumer’s character, general reputation, personal characteristics, or mode of living that is obtained through personal interviews with neighbors, friends, or associates of the consumer reported on, or with others with whom he or she is acquainted or who may have knowledge concerning those items of information, only if the report is not used in granting, extending, or decreasing credit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 430, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 265, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 10.

6-13.1-21.
Credit reports — Notice to individual — Requirements of users of credit reports.

No person or business shall request a credit report in connection with a consumer’s application for credit, employment, or insurance unless a consumer is first informed that a credit report may be requested in connection with the application.

Whenever credit or insurance for personal, family, household purposes, or employment involving a consumer is denied or the charge for that credit or insurance is increased either wholly or partly because of information contained in a credit report from a credit bureau, the user of the credit report shall advise the consumer against whom the adverse action has been taken and supply the name and address of the credit bureau making the report.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 430, § 1; P. L. 1994, ch. 265, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 10.

6-13.1-22.
Access to credit reports.

Any consumer who requests disclosure of his or her credit file from a credit bureau shall be entitled to have mailed to the consumer a copy of the information in the files of the credit bureau that pertains to the consumer at the time of the consumer’s request for disclosure within four (4) working days of the request. The credit bureau may impose a reasonable charge for the report, but that charge shall not exceed eight dollars ($8.00) per report. The maximum charge for the report may be raised annually not to exceed the increase in the Consumer Price Index (CPI). The copy shall be furnished without charge if the request for a copy of the report is the result of a consumer being notified that adverse action has been taken on a credit application based on the credit report, provided the request for the report is made within sixty (60) days of receipt of the notice.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 430, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 10.

6-13.1-23.
Disputed credit report.

If the completeness or accuracy of any item of information contained in a consumer’s file is disputed by that consumer, and the dispute is directly conveyed to the credit bureau by the consumer, the credit bureau shall within thirty (30) calendar days reinvestigate the current status of that information unless it has reasonable grounds to believe that the dispute by the consumer is frivolous or irrelevant. If after the reinvestigation that information is found to be inaccurate or can no longer be verified, the credit bureau shall promptly delete that information. The presence of contradictory information in the consumer’s file does not in and of itself constitute reasonable grounds for believing the dispute is frivolous or irrelevant.

If the reinvestigation does not resolve the dispute, the consumer may file a brief statement stating the nature of the dispute. The credit bureau may limit statements of dispute to not more than one hundred (100) words if it provides the consumer with assistance in writing a clear summary of the dispute.

Whenever a statement of dispute is filed, unless there is reasonable grounds to believe that it is frivolous or irrelevant, the credit bureau shall, in any subsequent consumer report containing the information in question, clearly note that it is disputed by the consumer and provide either the consumer’s statement or a clear and accurate codification or summary of that statement.

Following any deletion or correction of information that is found to be inaccurate or whose accuracy can no longer be verified or any notation as to disputed information, the credit bureau shall properly furnish a copy of the corrected credit report to the consumer at no charge, and at the request of the consumer, furnish a copy of the corrected report to any person specifically designated by the consumer who has within two (2) years prior thereto received a credit report for employment purposes, or within six (6) months received a credit report for any other purpose, that contained the deleted, corrected, or disputed information. The credit bureau shall clearly and conspicuously disclose to the consumer his rights to make that request. The disclosure shall be made at or prior to the time the information is deleted or the consumer’s statement regarding the disputed information is received.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 430, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 10.

6-13.1-24.
Registration with secretary of state.

Any credit bureau doing business in this state shall immediately register in the office of the secretary of state and shall state its corporate or company name; agent for service of process; business address; and phone number. Any credit bureau shall notify the office of secretary of state, in writing, of any change in name, agent, address, or telephone number within thirty (30) days of the change.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 430, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 10.

6-13.1-25.
Penalties.

A violation of §§

6-13.1-21

,

6-13.1-22

or

6-13.1-23

shall constitute a deceptive trade practice for enforcement purposes. Any credit bureau that negligently fails to comply with the requirements imposed under this chapter with respect to any consumer and that does not achieve compliance within three (3) working days of being notified of its noncompliance by the consumer is liable to that consumer in an amount equal to the sum of ten dollars ($10.00) per day for each day of noncompliance, beginning on the fourth day following the date that the credit bureau is notified by the consumer of the noncompliance; provided that there is noncompliance as determined by the court, plus any actual damages sustained by the consumer as a result of the negligent failure; and in the case of any successful action to enforce any provision under this chapter, the costs of the action together with reasonable attorney’s fees as determined by the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 430, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 10.

6-13.1-26.
Severability.

If any one or more sections, clauses, sentences or parts of this chapter shall for any reason be adjudged unconstitutional or otherwise invalid in any court, that judgment shall not affect, impair or invalidate the remaining provisions of this chapter but shall be confined in its operation to the specific provisions so held unconstitutional or invalid and the inapplicability or invalidity of any section, clause or provisions of this chapter in any one or more instances or circumstances shall not be taken to affect or prejudice in any way its applicability or validity in any other instance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 430, § 1.

6-13.1-27.
Employment status information.

A consumer may, at no charge, furnish a statement, sworn and notarized, of any lapse in employment to the credit bureau to become part of the record in the consumer file. This employment information is subject to the provisions of §

6-13.1-23

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 59, § 1.

6-13.1-28.
Financing of motor vehicles — Term and rate of interest prominently displayed.

Any contract to finance the sale of a motor vehicle shall prominently display the term and rate of interest.

The borrower’s initials or signature shall appear immediately adjacent to the term and to the rate of interest on the loan agreement that shall only serve as an acknowledgement that the borrower has been informed of the terms and rate. The borrower shall also be required to separately sign the loan agreement to bind himself or herself to the contract.

Any agreement to finance a motor vehicle that does not comply with the provision of this section shall be voidable within thirty (30) days at the option of the borrower; provided, however, the borrower shall be responsible for any damage to the vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 171, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 381, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 390, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 10.

6-13.1-29.
Furnishing of credit reports.

No credit bureau doing business in this state shall use all or part of a consumer’s social security number as the sole factor when determining whether a credit report in its files matches the identity of a person who is the subject of a credit inquiry from a user of credit reports. When a social security number is used as a factor, a credit bureau may disclose a credit report in its files to an inquiring user of credit reports only if the name also matches the identity of the person who is the subject of the inquiry.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 404, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 412, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 10; P.L. 2022, ch. 344, § 1, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 345, § 1, effective June 29, 2022.

6-13.1-30.
Cash payment for retail purchases.

It shall be a deceptive trade practice in violation of this chapter for any retail establishment offering goods or services for sale to discriminate against a prospective customer by requiring the use of credit for purchase of goods or services. All retail establishments shall accept legal tender currency when offered as payment. Provided, the provisions of this section shall not apply to online purchases or sales made over the internet.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 47, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 78, § 1.